Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201672-1710
Community board; report; contents.

A community board shall report electronically at
least annually to the Legislature on the activities of the community board
and the center. The report shall include, at minimum, the name of each applicant
whose application the community board rejects, together with the reasons for
the rejection, and the name of each applicant whose application the community
board favorably evaluates.

Laws 1990, LB 409, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 132.